District of Columbia statutes.
29-405.28

Inspectors of election.

(a)

A membership corporation may appoint one or more inspectors to act at a meeting of members and make a report in the form of a record of the inspectors’ determinations. Each inspector shall execute the duties of inspector impartially and according to the best of the inspector’s ability.

(b)

The inspectors shall:

(1)

Ascertain the number of members and their voting power;

(2)

Determine the members present at a meeting;

(3)

Determine the validity of proxies and ballots;

(4)

Count all votes; and

(5)

Determine the result.

(c)

An inspector may, but need not, be a director, member of a designated body, member, officer, or employee of the membership corporation. An individual who is a candidate for office to be filled at the meeting may not be an inspector.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-401.50.